Washington statutes.
RCW 26.28.010

Age of majority.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, all persons shall be deemed and taken to be of full age for all purposes at the age of eighteen years.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 17 s 1; 1923 c 72 s 2; Code 1881 s 2363; 1866 p 92 s 1; 1863 p 434 s 1; 1854 p 407 s 1; RRS s 10548.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 292: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 292 s 77.]

Saving—1923 c 72: "This act shall not apply to females who shall have attained the age of eighteen years at the time this act shall go into effect." [ 1923 c 72 s 3.] 1923 c 72 was codified as RCW 11.92.010 and 26.28.010.

Age of majority for probate law and procedure purposes: RCW 11.76.080 and 11.76.095.